Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1016.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-2-102, amend (4)
as follows:
24-2-102. Appointment of officers and employees. (4) (a) If,
during any fiscal period YEAR, THE GOVERNOR DETERMINES THAT there
are not, OR WILL NOT BE, sufficient revenues available for expenditure
-2- HB25B-1016

during such period THE FISCAL YEAR to carry on the functions of the state
government and to support its agencies and institutions, and such fact is
made to appear to the governor, THE GOVERNOR MAY, in the exercise of
his THE GOVERNOR'S discretion, by executive order, he may suspend or
discontinue, in whole or in part, the functions or services of any
department, board, bureau, or agency of the state government; except that
the authority of the governor to restrict the expenditure of moneys MONEY
appropriated from the capital construction fund shall MUST be determined
by the provisions of IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS IN section
24-75-201.5.
(b) Such A discontinuance or suspension shall become MADE
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1) BECOMES effective upon the first day
of the calendar month following the entry of such THE executive order
and shall MAY continue for such A period of time, not to exceed three
months, as shall be determined by such SET FORTH IN THE executive order.
(c) (I) If, during any such period of time it again appears to WHEN
AN EXECUTIVE ORDER ISSUED BY THE GOVERNOR PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION IS IN EFFECT, the governor DETERMINES that such THE deficiency
of revenues still persists, from time to time, he THE GOVERNOR may
extend the operation of such THE executive order for a like period of time
not to exceed three months; but MONTHS.
(II) IF THE GOVERNOR EXTENDS THE OPERATION OF AN EXECUTIVE
ORDER PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL FORMULATE A PLAN FOR REDUCING GENERAL FUND
EXPENDITURES. THE GOVERNOR SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY OF THE PLAN. WITHIN TWENTY-EIGHT DAYS AFTER EXTENSION
OF THE EXECUTIVE ORDER PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(c)(I) OF THIS
-3- HB25B-1016

SECTION, THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE SHALL HOLD A MEETING TO
CONSULT WITH THE GOVERNOR ABOUT THE PLAN. THE GOVERNOR OR THE
OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING, OR BOTH, SHALL ATTEND THE
JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE MEETING TO PRESENT THE PLAN AND CONSULT
WITH THE COMMITTEE. THE HEAD OF ANY DEPARTMENT INCLUDED IN THE
GOVERNOR'S PLAN, OR THE DEPARTMENT HEAD'S DESIGNEE, SHALL BE
AVAILABLE AT THE MEETING, INCLUDING BEING AVAILABLE REMOTELY IF
NECESSARY, TO RESPOND TO QUESTIONS FROM THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE.
(d) The state shall not be IS NOT liable for the payment of any
claim for salaries or expenses SUBJECT TO A SUSPENSION OR
DISCONTINUATION PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1) purporting to have
accrued against any such department, board, bureau, or agency during any
such period of THE suspension OR DISCONTINUATION, and the controller
shall not issue nor may AND the state treasurer SHALL NOT honor any
warrant therefor.
(e) Elective officers shall not be subject to the provisions of this
article ARTICLE 2, parts 2 and 11 of article 30, and articles 31, 35, 36, and
101 to 111 of this title TITLE 24.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-201.5, amend
(1) as follows:
24-75-201.5. Revenue shortfalls - required actions by the
governor with respect to the reserve - definition. (1) (a) Whenever the
revenue estimate for the current fiscal year, prepared BY THE GOVERNOR
in accordance with section 24-75-201.3 (2), OR AN INTERIM REVENUE
ESTIMATE PREPARED BY THE GOVERNOR, indicates that general fund
expenditures for such THAT fiscal year based on appropriations then in
-4- HB25B-1016

effect will result in the use of one-half or more of the reserve required by
section 24-75-201.1 (1)(d), the governor shall formulate a plan for
reducing such general fund expenditures so that said THE reserve, as of
the close of the fiscal year, will be at least one-half of the amount
required by said section 24-75-201.1 (1)(d). The governor shall promptly
notify the general assembly of the plan. AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER
RECEIVING THE NOTIFICATION, THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE SHALL
HOLD A MEETING TO CONSULT WITH THE GOVERNOR ABOUT THE PLAN. THE
GOVERNOR OR THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING, OR BOTH,
SHALL ATTEND THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE MEETING TO PRESENT THE
PLAN AND CONSULT WITH THE COMMITTEE. THE HEAD OF ANY
DEPARTMENT INCLUDED IN THE GOVERNOR'S PLAN, OR THE DEPARTMENT
HEAD'S DESIGNEE, SHALL BE AVAILABLE AT THE MEETING, INCLUDING
BEING AVAILABLE REMOTELY IF NECESSARY, TO RESPOND TO QUESTIONS
FROM THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE. AFTER THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE MEETING, the plan shall be promptly implemented by the
governor SHALL PROMPTLY IMPLEMENT THE PLAN using the procedures set
forth in section 24-2-102 (4) or 24-50-109.5 or any other lawful means.
(b) to (g) Repealed.
(h) (b) Whenever the revenue estimate for the current fiscal year,
prepared BY THE GOVERNOR in accordance with section 24-75-201.3 (2),
OR AN INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE PREPARED BY THE GOVERNOR,
indicates that general fund expenditures for that fiscal year based on
appropriations then in effect will result in the use of an amount of the
reserve required by section 24-75-201.1 (1)(d) that would result in that
reserve equaling less than one billion dollars, the governor shall formulate
a plan for reducing such general fund expenditures so that said THE
-5- HB25B-1016

reserve, as of the close of the fiscal year, will be at least one billion
dollars. The governor shall promptly notify the general assembly of the
plan. and AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER RECEIVING THE NOTIFICATION,
THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE SHALL HOLD A MEETING TO CONSULT WITH
THE GOVERNOR ABOUT THE PLAN. THE GOVERNOR AND THE OFFICE OF
STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING SHALL ATTEND THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE MEETING TO PRESENT THE PLAN AND CONSULT WITH THE
COMMITTEE. AFTER THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE MEETING, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL promptly implement the plan in accordance with
section 24-2-102 (4) or 24-50-109.5 or any other lawful means.
(c) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1), "INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE
PREPARED BY THE GOVERNOR" MEANS AN UPDATED REVENUE ESTIMATE
IN THE TIME BETWEEN TWO ESTIMATES MADE BY THE GOVERNOR
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-75-201.3 (2), WHICH INTERIM ESTIMATE IS
PREPARED BY THE GOVERNOR, DESIGNATED BY THE GOVERNOR AS AN
INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE THAT IS AN UPDATE TO THE MOST RECENT
PRIOR REVENUE ESTIMATE, TRANSMITTED TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY,
AND PRESENTED AT A MEETING OF THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE AS AN
INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE THAT IS AN UPDATE TO THE MOST RECENT
PRIOR REVENUE ESTIMATE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-201.3, add (3)
as follows:
24-75-201.3. Procedures relating to revenue estimates. (3) IF
THE GOVERNOR ISSUES AN INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE IN THE TIME
BETWEEN TWO ESTIMATES MADE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION OR THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF ISSUES AN INTERIM REVENUE
ESTIMATE BETWEEN ITS REGULARLY ISSUED QUARTERLY REVENUE
-6- HB25B-1016

ESTIMATES, THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE SHALL HOLD A MEETING AS
SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF THE INTERIM REVENUE
ESTIMATE TO HEAR A PRESENTATION OF THE INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE.
IF THE GOVERNOR ISSUED AN INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE, THE DIRECTOR
OF THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING SHALL PRESENT THE
INTERIM ESTIMATE TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE. IF THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL STAFF ISSUED AN INTERIM REVENUE ESTIMATE, THE CHIEF
ECONOMIST OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL PRESENT THE
INTERIM ESTIMATE TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE. IF BOTH THE
GOVERNOR AND THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF ISSUED INTERIM
REVENUE ESTIMATES, THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE MAY HEAR
PRESENTATIONS ABOUT EACH ESTIMATE AT THE SAME MEETING.
SECTION 4. Applicability. This act applies to executive orders
issued, plans formulated, and revenue estimates and interim revenue
estimates made on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-7- HB25B-1016